Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1008.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1309 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1309. Renewal of registration.At least 60 days prior to the expiration of each registration, the department shall send to the registrant an application for renewal of registration[.], along with a text message or email, if the department has the necessary information to enable that communication, notifying the registrant of the expiration date of the registration. The telephone number or email address shall be voluntarily provided to the department, and the department may not provide this information to third parties. The text message or email shall be sent once each week until the registration has been renewed. 123456789101112131415161718 Upon return of the application, accompanied by self-certification of financial responsibility and the applicable fee or fees, the department shall send to the registrant a renewed registration card. An application for renewal of registration for a motor carrier vehicle shall also be accompanied by self-certification of current safety inspection. Failure to receive a renewal application shall not relieve a registrant from the responsibility to renew the registration.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1008PN1095 - 2 - 123456789